apertium-pan.pan_Guru.dix
    <pardef n="ਕ/ਰ__vblex_tv">
      <e><p><l>ਰਾਂਗਾ</l><r>ਰ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਰਾਂਗੇ</l><r>ਰ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਰਾਂਗੀ</l><r>ਰ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਰਾਂਗੇ</l><r>ਰ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਰੇਗਾ</l><r>ਰ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਰੋਗਾ</l><r>ਰ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਰੇਗੀ</l><r>ਰ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਰੇਂਗੀ</l><r>ਰ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਰੇਗਾ</l><r>ਰ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਰੇਂਗੇ</l><r>ਰ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਰੇਗੀ</l><r>ਰ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਰੇਂਗੀ</l><r>ਰ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਰਣਵਾਲਾ</l><r>ਰ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਰਣਵਾਲੇ</l><r>ਰ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਰਣਵਾਲੀ</l><r>ਰ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਰਣਵਾਲੀ</l><r>ਰ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਰਣਾ</l><r>ਰ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="inf"/><s n="nom"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ਰਨਾ</l><r>ਰ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="inf"/><s n="nom"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਰਣੀ</l><r>ਰ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="inf"/><s n="nom"/><s n="f"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ਰਨੀ</l><r>ਰ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="inf"/><s n="nom"/><s n="f"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ਰਨ</l><r>ਰ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="inf"/><s n="nom"/><s n="mf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਰਣ</l><r>ਰ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="inf"/><s n="nom"/><s n="mf"/></r></p></e>

      <e r="LR"><p><l>ਰਨੇ</l><r>ਰ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="inf"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ਰਣੇ</l><r>ਰ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="inf"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਰਣ</l><r>ਰ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="inf"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਰਾਂ</l><r>ਰ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਰੇਂ</l><r>ਰ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਰੋ</l><r>ਰ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਰੋ</l><r>ਰ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਰ</l><r>ਰ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="stem"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ੇ</l><r>ਰ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="stem"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਰੇਂ</l><r>ਰ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਰ</l><r>ਰ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="frm"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਰੋ</l><r>ਰ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਰੇ</l><r>ਰ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਰਦਾ</l><r>ਰ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਰਦੇ</l><r>ਰ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ਰਦਿਆਂ</l><r>ਰ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਰਦੀ</l><r>ਰ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਰਦੀਆਂ</l><r>ਰ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ਰਦਿਆਂ</l><r>ਰ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ਰਕੇ</l><r>ਰ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="gna"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੀਤਾ</l><r>ਰ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ੀਤੇ</l><r>ਰ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੀਤੇ</l><r>ਰ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੀਤੀ</l><r>ਰ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ੀਤੀਆਂ</l><r>ਰ<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="ਕਰ"><i>ਕ</i><par n="ਕ/ਰ__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="ਪੈਦਾ ਕਰ"><i>ਪੈਦਾ<b/>ਕ</i><par n="ਕ/ਰ__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="ਪੇਸ਼ ਕਰ"><i>ਪੇਸ਼<b/>ਕ</i><par n="ਕ/ਰ__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="ਸੇਵਾ ਕਰ"><i>ਸੇਵਾ<b/>ਕ</i><par n="ਕ/ਰ__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="ਸਨਮਾਨ ਕਰ"><i>ਸਨਮਾਨ<b/>ਕ</i><par n="ਕ/ਰ__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="ਅੰਤ ਕਰ"><i>ਅੰਤ<b/>ਕ</i><par n="ਕ/ਰ__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="ਪ੍ਰਸਤੁਤ ਕਰ"><i>ਪ੍ਰਸਤੁਤ<b/>ਕ</i><par n="ਕ/ਰ__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="ਅਦਲ-ਬਦਲ ਕਰ"><i>ਅਦਲ-ਬਦਲ<b/>ਕ</i><par n="ਕ/ਰ__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="ਅਨੁਮਾਨ ਕਰ"><i>ਅਨੁਮਾਨ<b/>ਕ</i><par n="ਕ/ਰ__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="ਧਿਆਨ ਕਰ"><i>ਧਿਆਨ<b/>ਕ</i><par n="ਕ/ਰ__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="ਖੇਡ ਕਰ"><i>ਖੇਡ<b/>ਕ</i><par n="ਕ/ਰ__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="ਵਿਸ਼ਲੇਸ਼ਣ ਕਰ"><i>ਵਿਸ਼ਲੇਸ਼ਣ<b/>ਕ</i><par n="ਕ/ਰ__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="ਪ੍ਰਦਾਨ ਕਰ"><i>ਪ੍ਰਦਾਨ<b/>ਕ</i><par n="ਕ/ਰ__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="ਸਹਾਇਤਾ ਕਰ"><i>ਸਹਾਇਤਾ<b/>ਕ</i><par n="ਕ/ਰ__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="ਸ਼ਹੀਦ ਕਰ"><i>ਸ਼ਹੀਦ<b/>ਕ</i><par n="ਕ/ਰ__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="ਤਬਦੀਲੀ ਕਰ"><i>ਤਬਦੀਲੀ<b/>ਕ</i><par n="ਕ/ਰ__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="ਸੰਚਾਰਿਤ ਕਰ"><i>ਸੰਚਾਰਿਤ<b/>ਕ</i><par n="ਕ/ਰ__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="ਜ਼ਿਕਰ ਕਰ"><i>ਜ਼ਿਕਰ<b/>ਕ</i><par n="ਕ/ਰ__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="ਮੁਹੱਈਆ ਕਰ"><i>ਮੁਹੱਈਆ<b/>ਕ</i><par n="ਕ/ਰ__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="ਅਦਾ ਕਰ"><i>ਅਦਾ<b/>ਕ</i><par n="ਕ/ਰ__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="ਇਕੱਠਾ ਕਰ"><i>ਇਕੱਠਾ<b/>ਕ</i><par n="ਕ/ਰ__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="ਪ੍ਰੇਰਿਤ ਕਰ"><i>ਪ੍ਰੇਰਿਤ<b/>ਕ</i><par n="ਕ/ਰ__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="ਪੈਦਾ ਕਰ"><i>ਪੈਦਾ<b/>ਕ</i><par n="ਕ/ਰ__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="ਮਜ਼ਬੂਤ ਕਰ"><i>ਮਜ਼ਬੂਤ<b/>ਕ</i><par n="ਕ/ਰ__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="ਨਿਰਧਾਰਤ ਕਰ"><i>ਨਿਰਧਾਰਤ<b/>ਕ</i><par n="ਕ/ਰ__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="ਉਤਪੰਨ ਕਰ"><i>ਉਤਪੰਨ<b/>ਕ</i><par n="ਕ/ਰ__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="ਘੋਸ਼ਿਤ ਕਰ"><i>ਘੋਸ਼ਿਤ<b/>ਕ</i><par n="ਕ/ਰ__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="ਅਖਤਿਆਰ ਕਰ"><i>ਅਖਤਿਆਰ<b/>ਕ</i><par n="ਕ/ਰ__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="ਇਖ਼ਤਿਆਰ ਕਰ"><i>ਇਖ਼ਤਿਆਰ<b/>ਕ</i><par n="ਕ/ਰ__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="ਉਪਲਬਧ ਕਰ"><i>ਉਪਲਬਧ<b/>ਕ</i><par n="ਕ/ਰ__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="ਕਲਿੱਕ ਕਰ"><i>ਕਲਿੱਕ<b/>ਕ</i><par n="ਕ/ਰ__vblex_tv"/></e>
